Florida, session 2026, SB1758.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 148 149 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 409.904, Florida 150 Statutes, is amended to read: 151 409.904âOptional payments for eligible persons.âThe agency 152 may make payments for medical assistance and related services on 153 behalf of the following persons who are determined to be 154 eligible subject to the income, assets, and categorical 155 eligibility tests set forth in federal and state law. Payment on 156 behalf of these Medicaid eligible persons is subject to the 157 availability of moneys and any limitations established by the 158 General Appropriations Act or chapter 216. 159 (4)âA low-income person who meets all other requirements 160 for Medicaid eligibility except citizenship and who is in need 161 of emergency medical services. The eligibility of such a 162 recipient is limited to the period of the emergency, in 163 accordance with federal regulations. The agency may conduct 164 retrospective reviews or audits of services rendered to the 165 individual and claims submitted by the provider to validate the 166 existence and duration of the emergency medical condition and 167 whether the services rendered were necessary to treat the 168 emergency medical condition, regardless of whether the provider 169 obtained prior authorization for the services. 170 Section 2.âSection 409.9041, Florida Statutes, is created 171 to read: 172 409.9041âMedicaid work and community engagement 173 requirements.â 174 (1)âThe Legislature finds that assisting able-bodied adult 175 Medicaid recipients in achieving self-sufficiency through 176 meaningful work and community engagement is essential to 177 ensuring that the state Medicaid program remains a sustainable 178 resource for residents who are most in need of such assistance. 179 (2)(a)âThe agency shall seek federal approval to implement 180 mandatory work and community engagement requirements for able 181 bodied adults, as specified in this section, as a condition of 182 obtaining and maintaining coverage under the state Medicaid 183 program. The agency may not implement the mandatory work and 184 community engagement requirements until it receives federal 185 approval through a Medicaid waiver and the agencyâs business 186 plan submitted under paragraph (b) is specifically approved by 187 the Legislature. 188 (b)âThe agency shall, in consultation with the Department 189 of Children and Families and the Department of Commerce, develop 190 a business plan to implement this section. The plan must include 191 methods for determining Medicaid eligibility and the 192 applicability of exemptions under subsections (3) and (4) on an 193 ongoing basis and an analysis representing the potential effects 194 that implementing this section will have on Medicaid enrollment 195 and expenditures. The plan must also include a methodology to 196 provide those Medicaid recipients who stand to lose Medicaid 197 eligibility due to earning income under the requirements of 198 subsection (3) with a transition period to temporarily maintain 199 eligibility, under parameters similar to those that enable a 200 family eligible for temporary cash assistance to temporarily 201 maintain Medicaid eligibility under s. 445.029. The agency shall 202 submit the plan to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 203 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later than 204 December 1, 2026. 205 (3)(a)âMedicaid recipients between the ages of 19 and 64 206 years, inclusive, must meet the work or community engagement 207 requirements of this section, unless they are one of the 208 following: 209 1.âIndian as defined under 42 C.F.R. s. 438.14(a). 210 2.âA parent, guardian, caretaker relative, or family 211 caregiver of a dependent child younger than 14 years of age or 212 of a disabled individual. For purposes of this paragraph, the 213 term âfamily caregiverâ means an adult family member or other 214 individual who has a significant relationship with, and who 215 provides a broad range of assistance to, an individual with a 216 chronic or other health condition, disability, or functional 217 limitation. 218 3.âFormer foster youth younger than 26 years of age. 219 4.âA veteran with a total disability, as specified under 38 220 C.F.R. s. 3.340 or as specified by a Veteran Affairs Disability 221 Ratings Letter issued by the United States Department of 222 Veterans Affairs. 223 5.âAn individual classified as medically frail under the 224 Medicaid Institutionalized Care Program; categorized as aged, 225 blind, or disabled under the state Medicaid program; or who has 226 a developmental disability as defined in s. 393.063. 227 6.âAn individual living in a household that receives 228 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits and who is 229 already in compliance with work requirements pursuant to s. 230 445.024. 231 7.âAn individual participating in a residential substance 232 use treatment program. 233 8.âAn inmate of a public institution. 234 9.âA woman eligible for Medicaid coverage in a pregnancy 235 related or postpartum care category. 236 10.âA person receiving hospice services under part IV of 237 chapter 400 who has a medical prognosis that his or her life 238 expectancy is 6 months or less if his or her illness runs its 239 normal course. 240 (b)âA person may satisfy the work or community engagement 241 requirements of this section by participating in one or more of 242 the following activities for at least 80 hours per month: 243 1.âPaid employment. 244 2.âOn-the-job-training. 245 3.âVocational educational training. 246 4.âJob skills training directly related to employment. 247 5.âEducation directly related to employment. 248 6.âSatisfactory attendance at a secondary school or in a 249 course of study leading to a high school equivalency diploma. 250 7.âEnrollment at least half-time as defined in 34 C.F.R. s. 251 668.2(b) in a postsecondary education program to obtain a 252 credential on the Master Credentials List as maintained pursuant 253 to s. 445.004(6)(e). 254 8.âAny other work activity designated as such by the 255 Department of Commerce and provided by a local workforce 256 development board pursuant to s. 445.024. 257 (c)âParents with children ages 14 through 18 are required 258 to engage in work or community engagement activities only during 259 standard school hours. 260 (4)(a)âNotwithstanding any other statutory provision, in 261 order to maintain Medicaid coverage, an eligible Medicaid 262 recipient must, before enrollment and upon any redetermination 263 for coverage, demonstrate compliance with the work or community 264 engagement requirements of this section. 265 (b)âThe agency shall develop a process for ensuring 266 compliance with this section which aligns, to the extent 267 possible, with the processes currently in place relating to work 268 and community engagement requirements authorized under the 269 stateâs Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, including, 270 but not limited to, participant registration with a local 271 CareerSource center, employment and training programs, and 272 collaboration with the stateâs local workforce boards. 273 (c)âThe department shall verify, in accordance with its 274 procedures, that an individual subject to the work and community 275 engagement requirements of this section demonstrates compliance 276 during the individualâs regularly scheduled redetermination of 277 eligibility and at least every 6 months thereafter. 278 (5)âThe agency, in coordination with the department, shall 279 conduct outreach regarding the implementation of the work and 280 community engagement requirements of this section. The outreach 281 must include, at a minimum, notification to impacted 282 individuals, including timelines for implementation, 283 requirements for compliance, penalties for noncompliance, and 284 information on how to request an exemption. 285 (6)âIf a recipient subject to the work and community 286 engagement requirements of this section is determined to be in 287 noncompliance with such requirements, the agency, in 288 coordination with the department, must notify the recipient of 289 the finding of noncompliance and the impact to his or her 290 eligibility for continued receipt of Medicaid services. The 291 notice must include, at a minimum, notification of all of the 292 following: 293 (a)âThat the recipient is eligible for a grace period of 30 294 days to either come into compliance with the requirements or 295 request an exemption from the requirements and that Medicaid 296 coverage of services will continue during the grace period. 297 (b)âThat if, following the 30-day period, the individual 298 has not come into compliance with or requested an exemption from 299 the work and community engagement requirements, his or her 300 application for assistance will be denied and services 301 terminated at the end of the month following the month in which 302 such 30-calendar-day period ends. 303 (c)âThe right of the individual to request a fair hearing 304 if he or she is determined to be noncompliant with program 305 requirements and disenrolled from the state Medicaid program. 306 (d)âThe manner in which he or she can reapply for medical 307 assistance under the state Medicaid program. 308 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 309 409.905, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (f) is 310 added to that subsection, to read: 311 409.905âMandatory Medicaid services.âThe agency may make 312 payments for the following services, which are required of the 313 state by Title XIX of the Social Security Act, furnished by 314 Medicaid providers to recipients who are determined to be 315 eligible on the dates on which the services were provided. Any 316 service under this section shall be provided only when medically 317 necessary and in accordance with state and federal law. 318 Mandatory services rendered by providers in mobile units to 319 Medicaid recipients may be restricted by the agency. Nothing in 320 this section shall be construed to prevent or limit the agency 321 from adjusting fees, reimbursement rates, lengths of stay, 322 number of visits, number of services, or any other adjustments 323 necessary to comply with the availability of moneys and any 324 limitations or directions provided for in the General 325 Appropriations Act or chapter 216. 326 (5)âHOSPITAL INPATIENT SERVICES.âThe agency shall pay for 327 all covered services provided for the medical care and treatment 328 of a recipient who is admitted as an inpatient by a licensed 329 physician or dentist to a hospital licensed under part I of 330 chapter 395. However, the agency shall limit the payment for 331 inpatient hospital services for a Medicaid recipient 21 years of 332 age or older to 45 days or the number of days necessary to 333 comply with the General Appropriations Act. 334 (a)1.âThe agency may implement reimbursement and 335 utilization management reforms in order to comply with any 336 limitations or directions in the General Appropriations Act, 337 which may include, but are not limited to: prior authorization 338 for inpatient psychiatric days; prior authorization for 339 nonemergency hospital inpatient admissions for individuals 21 340 years of age and older; authorization of emergency and urgent 341 care admissions within 24 hours after admission; enhanced 342 utilization and concurrent review programs for highly utilized 343 services; reduction or elimination of covered days of service; 344 adjusting reimbursement ceilings for variable costs; adjusting 345 reimbursement ceilings for fixed and property costs; and 346 implementing target rates of increase. 347 2.âThe agency may limit prior authorization for hospital 348 inpatient services to selected diagnosis-related groups, based 349 on an analysis of the cost and potential for unnecessary 350 hospitalizations represented by certain diagnoses. Admissions 351 for normal delivery and newborns are exempt from requirements 352 for prior authorization. 353 3.âIn implementing the provisions of this section related 354 to prior authorization, the agency shall ensure that the process 355 for authorization is accessible 24 hours per day, 7 days per 356 week and authorization is automatically granted when not denied 357 within 4 hours after the request. Authorization procedures must 358 include steps for review of denials. 359 4.âUpon implementing the prior authorization program for 360 hospital inpatient services, the agency shall discontinue its 361 hospital retrospective review program. However, This paragraph 362 subparagraph may not be construed to prevent the agency from 363 conducting retrospective reviews under s. 409.913, including, 364 but not limited to, reviews of prior-authorized claims and 365 reviews in which an overpayment is suspected due to a mistake or 366 submission of an improper claim or for other reasons that do not 367 rise to the level of fraud or abuse. 368 (f)âIn its coverage of services under this subsection, the 369 agency shall maintain cost-effective purchasing practices as 370 required by s. 409.912. 371 Section 4.âPresent subsections (14) through (29) of section 372 409.906, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (15) 373 through (30), respectively, and a new subsection (14) is added 374 to that section, to read: 375 409.906âOptional Medicaid services.âSubject to specific 376 appropriations, the agency may make payments for services which 377 are optional to the state under Title XIX of the Social Security 378 Act and are furnished by Medicaid providers to recipients who 379 are determined to be eligible on the dates on which the services 380 were provided. Any optional service that is provided shall be 381 provided only when medically necessary and in accordance with 382 state and federal law. Optional services rendered by providers 383 in mobile units to Medicaid recipients may be restricted or 384 prohibited by the agency. Nothing in this section shall be 385 construed to prevent or limit the agency from adjusting fees, 386 reimbursement rates, lengths of stay, number of visits, or 387 number of services, or making any other adjustments necessary to 388 comply with the availability of moneys and any limitations or 389 directions provided for in the General Appropriations Act or 390 chapter 216. If necessary to safeguard the stateâs systems of 391 providing services to elderly and disabled persons and subject 392 to the notice and review provisions of s. 216.177, the Governor 393 may direct the Agency for Health Care Administration to amend 394 the Medicaid state plan to delete the optional Medicaid service 395 known as âIntermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally 396 Disabled.â Optional services may include: 397 (14)âHOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES. 398 The agency shall seek federal approval to implement a program 399 that covers an expanded array of home- and community-based 400 services for adults 18 years of age and older diagnosed with a 401 serious mental illness who are high utilizers of behavioral 402 health services in an institutional setting. The program must be 403 designed to reduce the need for institutional levels of care for 404 adults with a serious mental illness. The agency shall work in 405 coordination with the Department of Children and Families to 406 develop the program. The agency and the department shall produce 407 estimates of the programâ²s potential costs to the Medicaid 408 program and cost-savings for the department. Such estimates must 409 be submitted to the Legislature as legislative budget requests 410 and appropriated in the General Appropriations Act before the 411 program may be implemented. 412 Section 5.âSection 409.91195, Florida Statutes, is amended 413 to read: 414 409.91195âMedicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics 415 Committee.âThere is created a Medicaid Pharmaceutical and 416 Therapeutics Committee within the agency for the purpose of 417 developing a Medicaid preferred drug list, a Medicaid preferred 418 physician-administered drug list, a Medicaid preferred product 419 list, and a high-cost drug list. 420 (1)âThe committee shall be composed of 11 members appointed 421 by the Governor. Four members shall be physicians, licensed 422 under chapter 458; one member licensed under chapter 459; five 423 members shall be pharmacists licensed under chapter 465; and one 424 member shall be a consumer representative. The members shall be 425 appointed to serve for terms of 2 years from the date of their 426 appointment. Members may be appointed to more than one term. The 427 agency shall serve as staff for the committee and assist them 428 with all ministerial duties. The Governor shall ensure that at 429 least some of the members of the committee represent Medicaid 430 participating physicians and pharmacies serving all segments and 431 diversity of the Medicaid population, and have experience in 432 either developing or practicing under a preferred drug list. At 433 least one of the members shall represent the interests of 434 pharmaceutical manufacturers. 435 (2)âCommittee members shall select a chairperson and a vice 436 chairperson each year from the committee membership. 437 (3)âThe committee shall meet at least quarterly and may 438 meet at other times at the discretion of the chairperson and 439 members. The committee shall comply with rules adopted by the 440 agency, including notice of any meeting of the committee 441 pursuant to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure 442 Act. 443 (4)âUpon recommendation of the committee, the agency shall 444 adopt a preferred drug list, a preferred physician-administered 445 drug list, a preferred product list, and a high-cost drug list 446 as described in s. 409.912(5). To the extent feasible, the 447 committee shall review all drug or product classes included on 448 the preferred drug list, the preferred physician-administered 449 drug list, the preferred product list, and the high-cost drug 450 list every 6 12 months, and may recommend additions to and 451 deletions from the lists preferred drug list, such that the 452 lists provide preferred drug list provides for medically 453 appropriate drug and product therapies for Medicaid patients 454 which achieve cost savings contained in the General 455 Appropriations Act. 456 (5)âExcept for antiretroviral drugs, reimbursement of drugs 457 not included on the preferred drug list, preferred physician 458 administered drug list, preferred product list, or high-cost 459 drug list is subject to prior authorization. 460 (6)âThe agency shall publish and disseminate the preferred 461 drug list, preferred physician-administered drug list, preferred 462 product list, and high-cost drug list to all Medicaid providers 463 in the state by Internet posting on the agencyâs website or in 464 other media. 465 (7)âThe committee shall ensure that interested parties, 466 including pharmaceutical manufacturers agreeing to provide a 467 supplemental rebate as outlined in this chapter, have an 468 opportunity to present public testimony to the committee with 469 information or evidence supporting inclusion of a drug or 470 product on the preferred drug list, preferred physician 471 administered drug list, preferred product list, or high-cost 472 drug list. Such public testimony must shall occur before prior 473 to any recommendations made by the committee for inclusion or 474 exclusion from the preferred drug list, preferred physician 475 administered drug list, preferred product list, or high-cost 476 drug list. Upon timely notice, the agency shall ensure that any 477 drug that has been approved or had any of its particular uses 478 approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration under 479 a priority review classification will be reviewed by the 480 committee at the next regularly scheduled meeting following 3 481 months of distribution of the drug to the general public. 482 (8)âThe committee shall develop its preferred drug list, 483 preferred physician-administered drug list, preferred product 484 list, and high-cost drug list recommendations by considering the 485 clinical efficacy, safety, and cost-effectiveness of a product. 486 (9)âThe Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee 487 may also make recommendations to the agency regarding the prior 488 authorization of any prescribed drug covered by Medicaid. 489 (10)âMedicaid recipients may appeal agency preferred drug 490 formulary decisions using the Medicaid fair hearing process 491 administered by the Agency for Health Care Administration. 492 Section 6.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 493 409.912, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (14) is 494 added to that section, to read: 495 409.912âCost-effective purchasing of health care.âThe 496 agency shall purchase goods and services for Medicaid recipients 497 in the most cost-effective manner consistent with the delivery 498 of quality medical care. To ensure that medical services are 499 effectively utilized, the agency may, in any case, require a 500 confirmation or second physicianâs opinion of the correct 501 diagnosis for purposes of authorizing future services under the 502 Medicaid program. This section does not restrict access to 503 emergency services or poststabilization care services as defined 504 in 42 C.F.R. s. 438.114. Such confirmation or second opinion 505 shall be rendered in a manner approved by the agency. The agency 506 shall maximize the use of prepaid per capita and prepaid 507 aggregate fixed-sum basis services when appropriate and other 508 alternative service delivery and reimbursement methodologies, 509 including competitive bidding pursuant to s. 287.057, designed 510 to facilitate the cost-effective purchase of a case-managed 511 continuum of care. The agency shall also require providers to 512 minimize the exposure of recipients to the need for acute 513 inpatient, custodial, and other institutional care and the 514 inappropriate or unnecessary use of high-cost services. The 515 agency shall contract with a vendor to monitor and evaluate the 516 clinical practice patterns of providers in order to identify 517 trends that are outside the normal practice patterns of a 518 providerâs professional peers or the national guidelines of a 519 providerâs professional association. The vendor must be able to 520 provide information and counseling to a provider whose practice 521 patterns are outside the norms, in consultation with the agency, 522 to improve patient care and reduce inappropriate utilization. 523 The agency may mandate prior authorization, drug therapy 524 management, or disease management participation for certain 525 populations of Medicaid beneficiaries, certain drug classes, or 526 particular drugs to prevent fraud, abuse, overuse, and possible 527 dangerous drug interactions. The Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics 528 Committee shall make recommendations to the agency on drugs for 529 which prior authorization is required. The agency shall inform 530 the Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee of its decisions 531 regarding drugs subject to prior authorization. The agency is 532 authorized to limit the entities it contracts with or enrolls as 533 Medicaid providers by developing a provider network through 534 provider credentialing. The agency may competitively bid single 535 source-provider contracts if procurement of goods or services 536 results in demonstrated cost savings to the state without 537 limiting access to care. The agency may limit its network based 538 on the assessment of beneficiary access to care, provider 539 availability, provider quality standards, time and distance 540 standards for access to care, the cultural competence of the 541 provider network, demographic characteristics of Medicaid 542 beneficiaries, practice and provider-to-beneficiary standards, 543 appointment wait times, beneficiary use of services, provider 544 turnover, provider profiling, provider licensure history, 545 previous program integrity investigations and findings, peer 546 review, provider Medicaid policy and billing compliance records, 547 clinical and medical record audits, and other factors. Providers 548 are not entitled to enrollment in the Medicaid provider network. 549 The agency shall determine instances in which allowing Medicaid 550 beneficiaries to purchase durable medical equipment and other 551 goods is less expensive to the Medicaid program than long-term 552 rental of the equipment or goods. The agency may establish rules 553 to facilitate purchases in lieu of long-term rentals in order to 554 protect against fraud and abuse in the Medicaid program as 555 defined in s. 409.913. The agency may seek federal waivers 556 necessary to administer these policies. 557 (5)(a)âThe agency shall implement a Medicaid prescribed 558 drug spending-control program that includes the following 559 components: 560 1.âA Medicaid preferred drug list and a Medicaid physician 561 administered drug list. The preferred drug list, which shall be 562 a listing of cost-effective therapeutic options recommended by 563 the Medicaid Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee established 564 pursuant to s. 409.91195 and adopted by the agency for each 565 therapeutic class on the preferred drug list. At the discretion 566 of the committee, and when feasible, the preferred drug list 567 should include at least two products in a therapeutic class. The 568 physician-administered drug list shall be a listing of 569 physician-administered drugs covered by the state Medicaid 570 program, based on the United States Food and Drug 571 Administrationâs approved indications and compendia in 42 U.S.C. 572 s. 1396r-8(g)(1)(B). Within the preferred physician-administered 573 drug list, there must be a section containing a list of 574 preferred physician-administered drugs that are cost-effective 575 therapeutic options recommended by the Medicaid Pharmaceutical 576 and Therapeutics Committee established pursuant to s. 409.91195. 577 The physician-administered drug list must be updated at least 578 twice a year. The agency may post and update the preferred drug 579 list and the preferred physician-administered drug updates to 580 the list on the agencyâs an Internet website without following 581 the rulemaking procedures of chapter 120. Antiretroviral agents 582 are excluded from the preferred drug list. The agency shall also 583 limit the amount of a prescribed drug dispensed to no more than 584 a 34-day supply unless the drug productsâ smallest marketed 585 package is greater than a 34-day supply, or the drug is 586 determined by the agency to be a maintenance drug in which case 587 a 100-day maximum supply may be authorized. The agency may seek 588 any federal waivers necessary to implement these cost-control 589 programs and to continue participation in the federal Medicaid 590 rebate program, or alternatively to negotiate state-only 591 manufacturer rebates. The agency may adopt rules to administer 592 this subparagraph. The agency shall continue to provide 593 unlimited contraceptive drugs and items. The agency must 594 establish procedures to ensure that: 595 a.âThere is a response to a request for prior authorization 596 by telephone or other telecommunication device within 24 hours 597 after receipt of a request for prior authorization; and 598 b.âA 72-hour supply of the drug prescribed is provided in 599 an emergency or when the agency does not provide a response 600 within 24 hours as required by sub-subparagraph a. 601 2.âA Medicaid preferred product list, which shall be a 602 listing of cost-effective therapeutic supplies recommended by 603 the Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee 604 established pursuant to s. 409.91195 and adopted by the agency 605 for each product class listed on the preferred product list and 606 reimbursed by the state Medicaid program through the pharmacy 607 point-of-sale. The agency may post the preferred product list 608 and updates to the list on the agencyâs website without 609 following the rulemaking procedures of chapter 120. 610 3.âA list of high-cost drugs recommended by the Medicaid 611 Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee established pursuant 612 to s. 409.91195 and adopted by the agency, for the purpose of 613 coverage, reimbursement, or billing guidance. The agency may 614 post the high-cost drug list and updates to the list on the 615 agencyâs website without following the rulemaking procedures of 616 chapter 120. The agency must establish procedures to ensure 617 that: 618 a.âThere is a response to a request for prior authorization 619 for a high-cost drug by telephone or other telecommunication 620 device within 24 hours after receipt of the request for prior 621 authorization; and 622 b.âA 72-hour supply of the high-cost drug prescribed is 623 provided in an emergency or when the agency does not provide a 624 response to a prior authorization request within 24 hours as 625 required by sub-subparagraph a. 626 4.âA provider of prescribed drugs is reimbursed in an 627 amount not to exceed the lesser of the actual acquisition cost 628 based on the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services National 629 Average Drug Acquisition Cost pricing files plus a professional 630 dispensing fee, the wholesale acquisition cost plus a 631 professional dispensing fee, the state maximum allowable cost 632 plus a professional dispensing fee, or the usual and customary 633 charge billed by the provider. 634 5.âA hospital facility administering long-acting 635 injectables for severe mental illness shall be reimbursed 636 separately from the diagnosis-related group. Long-acting 637 injectables administered for severe mental illness in a hospital 638 facility setting shall be reimbursed at no less than the actual 639 acquisition cost of the drug. 640 6.âThe agency shall contract with a vendor to perform a 641 detailed fiscal impact study to evaluate the 340B Drug Pricing 642 Program administered by the Health Resources and Services 643 Administration. The study must evaluate 340B compliance, 340B 644 drug purchases, and reimbursement methodologies within the fee 645 for-service program and Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program. 646 Statewide Medicaid Managed Care plans, pharmacy benefit 647 managers, and Medicaid providers shall submit to the agency all 648 data necessary for the completion of the study, including, but 649 not limited to, information related to drug purchasing, 650 reimbursement, billing and coding, and dispensing. Noncompliance 651 with the 340B data submission requirements of this subparagraph 652 may result in sanctions from the agency or the Board of 653 Pharmacy, as applicable. The agency shall submit the results of 654 the study to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 655 Speaker of the House of Representatives by June 30, 2027. 656 7.3.âThe agency shall develop and implement a process for 657 managing the drug therapies of Medicaid recipients who are using 658 significant numbers of prescribed drugs each month. The 659 management process may include, but is not limited to, 660 comprehensive, physician-directed medical-record reviews, claims 661 analyses, and case evaluations to determine the medical 662 necessity and appropriateness of a patientâs treatment plan and 663 drug therapies. The agency may contract with a private 664 organization to provide drug-program-management services. The 665 Medicaid drug benefit management program shall include 666 initiatives to manage drug therapies for HIV/AIDS patients, 667 patients using 20 or more unique prescriptions in a 180-day 668 period, and the top 1,000 patients in annual spending. The 669 agency shall enroll any Medicaid recipient in the drug benefit 670 management program if he or she meets the specifications of this 671 provision and is not enrolled in a Medicaid health maintenance 672 organization. 673 8.4.âThe agency may limit the size of its pharmacy network 674 based on need, competitive bidding, price negotiations, 675 credentialing, or similar criteria. The agency shall give 676 special consideration to rural areas in determining the size and 677 location of pharmacies included in the Medicaid pharmacy 678 network. A pharmacy credentialing process may include criteria 679 such as a pharmacyâs full-service status, location, size, 680 patient educational programs, patient consultation, disease 681 management services, and other characteristics. The agency may 682 impose a moratorium on Medicaid pharmacy enrollment if it is 683 determined that it has a sufficient number of Medicaid 684 participating providers. The agency must allow dispensing 685 practitioners to participate as a part of the Medicaid pharmacy 686 network regardless of the practitionerâs proximity to any other 687 entity that is dispensing prescription drugs under the Medicaid 688 program. A dispensing practitioner must meet all credentialing 689 requirements applicable to his or her practice, as determined by 690 the agency. 691 9.5.âThe agency shall develop and implement a program that 692 requires Medicaid practitioners who issue written prescriptions 693 for medicinal drugs to use a counterfeit-proof prescription pad 694 for Medicaid prescriptions. The agency shall require the use of 695 standardized counterfeit-proof prescription pads by prescribers 696 who issue written prescriptions for Medicaid recipients. The 697 agency may implement the program in targeted geographic areas or 698 statewide. 699 10.6.âThe agency may enter into arrangements that require 700 manufacturers of generic drugs prescribed to Medicaid recipients 701 to provide rebates of at least 15.1 percent of the average 702 manufacturer price for the manufacturerâs generic products. 703 These arrangements shall require that if a generic-drug 704 manufacturer pays federal rebates for Medicaid-reimbursed drugs 705 at a level below 15.1 percent, the manufacturer must provide a 706 supplemental rebate to the state in an amount necessary to 707 achieve a 15.1-percent rebate level. 708 11.7.âThe agency may establish a preferred drug list as 709 described in this subsection, and, pursuant to the establishment 710 of such preferred drug list, negotiate supplemental rebates from 711 manufacturers that are in addition to those required by Title 712 XIX of the Social Security Act and at no less than 14 percent of 713 the average manufacturer price as defined in 42 U.S.C. s. 1936 714 on the last day of a quarter unless the federal or supplemental 715 rebate, or both, equals or exceeds 29 percent. There is no upper 716 limit on the supplemental rebates the agency may negotiate. The 717 agency may determine that specific products, brand-name or 718 generic, are competitive at lower rebate percentages. Agreement 719 to pay the minimum supplemental rebate percentage guarantees a 720 manufacturer that the Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics 721 Committee will consider a product for inclusion on the preferred 722 drug list. However, a pharmaceutical manufacturer is not 723 guaranteed placement on the preferred drug list by simply paying 724 the minimum supplemental rebate. Agency decisions will be made 725 on the clinical efficacy of a drug and recommendations of the 726 Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee, as well as 727 the price of competing products minus federal and state rebates. 728 The agency may contract with an outside agency or contractor to 729 conduct negotiations for supplemental rebates. For the purposes 730 of this section, the term âsupplemental rebatesâ means cash 731 rebates. Value-added programs as a substitution for supplemental 732 rebates are prohibited. The agency may seek any federal waivers 733 to implement this initiative. 734 12.a.8.a.âThe agency may implement a Medicaid behavioral 735 drug management system. The agency may contract with a vendor 736 that has experience in operating behavioral drug management 737 systems to implement this program. The agency may seek federal 738 waivers to implement this program. 739 b.âThe agency, in conjunction with the Department of 740 Children and Families, may implement the Medicaid behavioral 741 drug management system that is designed to improve the quality 742 of care and behavioral health prescribing practices based on 743 best practice guidelines, improve patient adherence to 744 medication plans, reduce clinical risk, and lower prescribed 745 drug costs and the rate of inappropriate spending on Medicaid 746 behavioral drugs. The program may include the following 747 elements: 748 (I)âProvide for the development and adoption of best 749 practice guidelines for behavioral health-related drugs such as 750 antipsychotics, antidepressants, and medications for treating 751 bipolar disorders and other behavioral conditions; translate 752 them into practice; review behavioral health prescribers and 753 compare their prescribing patterns to a number of indicators 754 that are based on national standards; and determine deviations 755 from best practice guidelines. 756 (II)âImplement processes for providing feedback to and 757 educating prescribers using best practice educational materials 758 and peer-to-peer consultation. 759 (III)âAssess Medicaid beneficiaries who are outliers in 760 their use of behavioral health drugs with regard to the numbers 761 and types of drugs taken, drug dosages, combination drug 762 therapies, and other indicators of improper use of behavioral 763 health drugs. 764 (IV)âAlert prescribers to patients who fail to refill 765 prescriptions in a timely fashion, are prescribed multiple same 766 class behavioral health drugs, and may have other potential 767 medication problems. 768 (V)âTrack spending trends for behavioral health drugs and 769 deviation from best practice guidelines. 770 (VI)âUse educational and technological approaches to 771 promote best practices, educate consumers, and train prescribers 772 in the use of practice guidelines. 773 (VII)âDisseminate electronic and published materials. 774 (VIII)âHold statewide and regional conferences. 775 (IX)âImplement a disease management program with a model 776 quality-based medication component for severely mentally ill 777 individuals and emotionally disturbed children who are high 778 users of care. 779 13.9.âThe agency shall implement a Medicaid prescription 780 drug management system. 781 a.âThe agency may contract with a vendor that has 782 experience in operating prescription drug management systems in 783 order to implement this system. Any management system that is 784 implemented in accordance with this subparagraph must rely on 785 cooperation between physicians and pharmacists to determine 786 appropriate practice patterns and clinical guidelines to improve 787 the prescribing, dispensing, and use of drugs in the Medicaid 788 program. The agency may seek federal waivers to implement this 789 program. 790 b.âThe drug management system must be designed to improve 791 the quality of care and prescribing practices based on best 792 practice guidelines, improve patient adherence to medication 793 plans, reduce clinical risk, and lower prescribed drug costs and 794 the rate of inappropriate spending on Medicaid prescription 795 drugs. The program must: 796 (I)âProvide for the adoption of best practice guidelines 797 for the prescribing and use of drugs in the Medicaid program, 798 including translating best practice guidelines into practice; 799 reviewing prescriber patterns and comparing them to indicators 800 that are based on national standards and practice patterns of 801 clinical peers in their community, statewide, and nationally; 802 and determine deviations from best practice guidelines. 803 (II)âImplement processes for providing feedback to and 804 educating prescribers using best practice educational materials 805 and peer-to-peer consultation. 806 (III)âAssess Medicaid recipients who are outliers in their 807 use of a single or multiple prescription drugs with regard to 808 the numbers and types of drugs taken, drug dosages, combination 809 drug therapies, and other indicators of improper use of 810 prescription drugs. 811 (IV)âAlert prescribers to recipients who fail to refill 812 prescriptions in a timely fashion, are prescribed multiple drugs 813 that may be redundant or contraindicated, or may have other 814 potential medication problems. 815 14.10.âThe agency may contract for drug rebate 816 administration, including, but not limited to, calculating 817 rebate amounts, invoicing manufacturers, negotiating disputes 818 with manufacturers, and maintaining a database of rebate 819 collections. 820 15.11.âThe agency may specify the preferred daily dosing 821 form or strength for the purpose of promoting best practices 822 with regard to the prescribing of certain drugs as specified in 823 the General Appropriations Act and ensuring cost-effective 824 prescribing practices. 825 16.12.âThe agency may require prior authorization for 826 Medicaid-covered prescribed drugs. The agency may prior 827 authorize the use of a product: 828 a.âFor an indication not approved in labeling; 829 b.âTo comply with certain clinical guidelines; or 830 c.âIf the product has the potential for overuse, misuse, or 831 abuse. 832 833 The agency may require the prescribing professional to provide 834 information about the rationale and supporting medical evidence 835 for the use of a drug. The agency shall post prior 836 authorization, step-edit criteria and protocol, and updates to 837 the list of drugs that are subject to prior authorization on the 838 agencyâs Internet website within 21 days after the prior 839 authorization and step-edit criteria and protocol and updates 840 are approved by the agency. For purposes of this subparagraph, 841 the term âstep-editâ means an automatic electronic review of 842 certain medications subject to prior authorization. 843 17.13.âThe agency, in conjunction with the Pharmaceutical 844 and Therapeutics Committee, may require age-related prior 845 authorizations for certain prescribed drugs. The agency may 846 preauthorize the use of a drug for a recipient who may not meet 847 the age requirement or may exceed the length of therapy for use 848 of this product as recommended by the manufacturer and approved 849 by the Food and Drug Administration. Prior authorization may 850 require the prescribing professional to provide information 851 about the rationale and supporting medical evidence for the use 852 of a drug. 853 18.14.âThe agency shall implement a step-therapy prior 854 authorization approval process for medications excluded from the 855 preferred drug list. Medications listed on the preferred drug 856 list must be used within the previous 12 months before the 857 alternative medications that are not listed. The step-therapy 858 prior authorization may require the prescriber to use the 859 medications of a similar drug class or for a similar medical 860 indication unless contraindicated in the Food and Drug 861 Administration labeling. The trial period between the specified 862 steps may vary according to the medical indication. The step 863 therapy approval process shall be developed in accordance with 864 the committee as stated in s. 409.91195(7) and (8). A drug 865 product may be approved without meeting the step-therapy prior 866 authorization criteria if the prescribing physician provides the 867 agency with additional written medical or clinical documentation 868 that the product is medically necessary because: 869 a.âThere is not a drug on the preferred drug list to treat 870 the disease or medical condition which is an acceptable clinical 871 alternative; 872 b.âThe alternatives have been ineffective in the treatment 873 of the beneficiaryâs disease; 874 c.âThe drug product or medication of a similar drug class 875 is prescribed for the treatment of schizophrenia or schizotypal 876 or delusional disorders; prior authorization has been granted 877 previously for the prescribed drug; and the medication was 878 dispensed to the patient during the previous 12 months; or 879 d.âBased on historical evidence and known characteristics 880 of the patient and the drug, the drug is likely to be 881 ineffective, or the number of doses have been ineffective. 882 883 The agency shall work with the physician to determine the best 884 alternative for the patient. The agency may adopt rules waiving 885 the requirements for written clinical documentation for specific 886 drugs in limited clinical situations. 887 19.15.âThe agency shall implement a return and reuse 888 program for drugs dispensed by pharmacies to institutional 889 recipients, which includes payment of a $5 restocking fee for 890 the implementation and operation of the program. The return and 891 reuse program shall be implemented electronically and in a 892 manner that promotes efficiency. The program must permit a 893 pharmacy to exclude drugs from the program if it is not 894 practical or cost-effective for the drug to be included and must 895 provide for the return to inventory of drugs that cannot be 896 credited or returned in a cost-effective manner. The agency 897 shall determine if the program has reduced the amount of 898 Medicaid prescription drugs which are destroyed on an annual 899 basis and if there are additional ways to ensure more 900 prescription drugs are not destroyed which could safely be 901 reused. 902 (14)âNeither this section nor this chapter prevents the 903 agency from conducting retrospective reviews, investigations, 904 analyses, audits, or any combination thereof to determine 905 possible fraud, abuse, overpayment, or recipient neglect in the 906 state Medicaid program pursuant to s. 409.913, including, but 907 not limited to, reviews in which the services were the subject 908 of a utilization review or prior authorization process. 909 Section 7.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) and subsections 910 (2) and (6) of section 409.913, Florida Statutes, are amended to 911 read: 912 409.913âOversight of the integrity of the Medicaid 913 program.âThe agency shall operate a program to oversee the 914 activities of Florida Medicaid recipients, and providers and 915 their representatives, to ensure that fraudulent and abusive 916 behavior and neglect of recipients occur to the minimum extent 917 possible, and to recover overpayments and impose sanctions as 918 appropriate. Each January 15, the agency and the Medicaid Fraud 919 Control Unit of the Department of Legal Affairs shall submit a 920 report to the Legislature documenting the effectiveness of the 921 stateâs efforts to control Medicaid fraud and abuse and to 922 recover Medicaid overpayments during the previous fiscal year. 923 The report must describe the number of cases opened and 924 investigated each year; the sources of the cases opened; the 925 disposition of the cases closed each year; the amount of 926 overpayments alleged in preliminary and final audit letters; the 927 number and amount of fines or penalties imposed; any reductions 928 in overpayment amounts negotiated in settlement agreements or by 929 other means; the amount of final agency determinations of 930 overpayments; the amount deducted from federal claiming as a 931 result of overpayments; the amount of overpayments recovered 932 each year; the amount of cost of investigation recovered each 933 year; the average length of time to collect from the time the 934 case was opened until the overpayment is paid in full; the 935 amount determined as uncollectible and the portion of the 936 uncollectible amount subsequently reclaimed from the Federal 937 Government; the number of providers, by type, that are 938 terminated from participation in the Medicaid program as a 939 result of fraud and abuse; and all costs associated with 940 discovering and prosecuting cases of Medicaid overpayments and 941 making recoveries in such cases. The report must also document 942 actions taken to prevent overpayments and the number of 943 providers prevented from enrolling in or reenrolling in the 944 Medicaid program as a result of documented Medicaid fraud and 945 abuse and must include policy recommendations necessary to 946 prevent or recover overpayments and changes necessary to prevent 947 and detect Medicaid fraud. All policy recommendations in the 948 report must include a detailed fiscal analysis, including, but 949 not limited to, implementation costs, estimated savings to the 950 Medicaid program, and the return on investment. The agency must 951 submit the policy recommendations and fiscal analyses in the 952 report to the appropriate estimating conference, pursuant to s. 953 216.137, by February 15 of each year. The agency and the 954 Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Department of Legal Affairs 955 each must include detailed unit-specific performance standards, 956 benchmarks, and metrics in the report, including projected cost 957 savings to the state Medicaid program during the following 958 fiscal year. 959 (1)âFor the purposes of this section, the term: 960 (e)ââOverpaymentâ includes any amount that is not 961 authorized to be paid by the Medicaid program or that should not 962 have been paid, including payments made whether paid as a result 963 of inaccurate or improper cost reporting, improper claiming, 964 unacceptable practices, fraud, abuse, or mistake, and may 965 include amounts paid for goods or services that were the subject 966 of a utilization review or prior authorization process. 967 (2)âThe agency shall conduct, or cause to be conducted by 968 contract or otherwise, reviews, investigations, analyses, 969 audits, or any combination thereof, to determine possible fraud, 970 abuse, overpayment, or recipient neglect in the Medicaid program 971 and shall report the findings of any overpayments in audit 972 reports as appropriate. An overpayment determination may be 973 based upon retrospective reviews, investigations, analyses, 974 audits, or any combination thereof to determine possible fraud, 975 abuse, overpayment, or recipient neglect in the Medicaid 976 program, regardless of whether a prior authorization was issued. 977 At least 5 percent of all audits shall be conducted on a random 978 basis. As part of its ongoing fraud detection activities, the 979 agency shall identify and monitor, by contract or otherwise, 980 patterns of overutilization of Medicaid services based on state 981 averages. The agency shall track Medicaid provider prescription 982 and billing patterns and evaluate them against Medicaid medical 983 necessity criteria and coverage and limitation guidelines 984 adopted by rule. Medical necessity determination requires that 985 service be consistent with symptoms or confirmed diagnosis of 986 illness or injury under treatment and not in excess of the 987 patientâs needs. The agency shall conduct reviews of provider 988 exceptions to peer group norms and shall, using statistical 989 methodologies, provider profiling, and analysis of billing 990 patterns, detect and investigate abnormal or unusual increases 991 in billing or payment of claims for Medicaid services and 992 medically unnecessary provision of services. 993 (6)âAny notice required to be given to a provider under 994 this section is presumed to be sufficient notice if sent to the 995 mailing address last shown on the provider enrollment file. It 996 is the responsibility of the provider to furnish and keep the 997 agency informed of the providerâs current mailing and service 998 addresses address. United States Postal Service or other common 999 carrierâs proof of mailing or certified or registered mailing of 1000 such notice to the provider at the address shown on the provider 1001 enrollment file constitutes sufficient proof of notice. Any 1002 notice required to be given to the agency by this section must 1003 be sent to the agency at an address designated by rule. 1004 Section 8.âSection 414.321, Florida Statutes, is created to 1005 read: 1006 414.321âFood assistance eligibility.âFor purposes of 1007 eligibility determinations, the department shall: 1008 (1)âLimit eligibility to individuals who are residents of 1009 the United States and: 1010 (a)âCitizens or nationals of the United States; 1011 (b)âAliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence as 1012 defined in the Immigration and Nationality Act, as amended; 1013 (c)âAliens who have been granted the status of Cuban and 1014 Haitian entrant, as defined in the Refugee Education Assistance 1015 Act of 1980, as amended; or 1016 (d)âIndividuals who lawfully reside in the United States in 1017 accordance with the Compacts of Free Association referred to in 1018 the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation 1019 Act of 1996. 1020 (2)âRequire each applicant, or recipient for 1021 redetermination purposes, to provide documentation evidencing 1022 his or her shelter or utility expenses. 1023 (a)âThe department is prohibited from relying solely on an 1024 individualâs self-attestation in determining shelter or utility 1025 expenses. 1026 (b)âThe department may adopt policies and procedures to 1027 accommodate an applicant or a recipient who, due to recent 1028 residency changes, is temporarily unable to furnish adequate 1029 documentation of shelter or utility expenses. 1030 Section 9.âSection 414.332, Florida Statutes, is created to 1031 read: 1032 414.332âFood assistance payment accuracy plan.â 1033 (1)âThe department shall develop and implement a 1034 comprehensive food assistance payment accuracy improvement plan 1035 to reduce the stateâs payment error rate. The department must 1036 reduce the payment error rate to below 6 percent. The plan must 1037 address the root causes of payment errors identified through an 1038 in-depth, data-driven analysis. The plan must include, but need 1039 not be limited to, all of the following: 1040 (a)âEnhanced employee training and quality assurance. 1041 1.âThe department shall administer standardized training 1042 for all economic self-sufficiency program staff at least 1043 annually. Training must, at a minimum, review the most common 1044 reasons for payment errors and methods for preventing such 1045 errors, and include pre- and post-training testing to measure 1046 staff proficiency. 1047 2.âThe department shall establish a robust quality 1048 assurance review process that frequently reviews a statistically 1049 significant sample of cases before final benefit determination. 1050 This process must incorporate real-time, corrective feedback and 1051 on-the-job training for program staff and may not delay benefit 1052 determinations. 1053 (b)âImprovement in data sourcing. In contracting with 1054 entities providing data for verification of applicant and 1055 recipient information, the department shall maximize use of high 1056 quality automated data sources, including, but not limited to, 1057 comparing income and asset data with state, federal, and private 1058 sector data sources. 1059 (2)âBy July 15, 2026, the department shall submit the food 1060 assistance payment accuracy improvement plan to the Governor, 1061 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 1062 Representatives. 1063 (3)(a)âBeginning October 1, 2026, the department shall 1064 submit quarterly progress reports to the Governor, the President 1065 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives 1066 detailing: 1067 1.âThe stateâs most recent official and preliminary food 1068 assistance payment error rate. 1069 2.âA detailed breakdown of the most frequent and highest 1070 dollar value errors, including categorization by agency or 1071 client error and whether the error resulted in over- or under 1072 payment. 1073 3.âSpecific actions taken by the department under the food 1074 assistance payment accuracy improvement plan during the 1075 preceding quarter and data demonstrating the results of those 1076 actions. 1077 4.âA detailed plan to correct the most recently identified 1078 deficiencies. 1079 (b)âThis subsection is repealed on October 1, 2028. 1080 Section 10.âPresent subsections (6) through (11) of section 1081 414.39, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (7) 1082 through (12), respectively, and a new subsection (6) is added to 1083 that section, to read: 1084 414.39âFraud.â 1085 (6)âThe department shall require the use of photographic 1086 identification on the front of each newly issued and reissued 1087 electronic benefits transfer (EBT) card for each cardholder to 1088 the maximum extent allowed by federal laws and regulations. 1089 Section 11.âSubsection (2) of section 414.455, Florida 1090 Statutes, is amended to read: 1091 414.455âSupplemental Nutrition Assistance Program; 1092 legislative authorization; mandatory participation in employment 1093 and training programs.â 1094 (2)âUnless prohibited by the Federal Government, the 1095 department must require a person who is receiving food 1096 assistance; who is 18 to 64 59 years of age, inclusive; who does 1097 not have children under the age of 14 18 in his or her home; who 1098 does not qualify for an exemption; and who is determined by the 1099 department to be eligible, to participate in an employment and 1100 training program. The department shall apply and comply with 1101 exemptions from work requirements in accordance with applicable 1102 federal law. 1103 Section 12.âSubsection (1) of section 409.91196, Florida 1104 Statutes, is amended to read: 1105 409.91196âSupplemental rebate agreements; public records 1106 and public meetings exemption.â 1107 (1)âThe rebate amount, percent of rebate, manufacturerâs 1108 pricing, and supplemental rebate, and other trade secrets as 1109 defined in s. 688.002 that the agency has identified for use in 1110 negotiations, held by the Agency for Health Care Administration 1111 under s. 409.912(5)(a)11. s. 409.912(5)(a)7. are confidential 1112 and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 1113 Constitution. 1114 Section 13.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.